Utah statutes.
75-6-310.   Nontestamentary transfer on death.

(1)  A transfer on death resulting from a registration in beneficiary form is effective by reason of the contract regarding the registration between the owner and the registering entity and this part and is not testamentary.

(2)  This part does not limit the rights of creditors of security owners against beneficiaries and other transferees under the laws of this state.

